Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.330

Impaired physician program—Evaluation of physician.

If the commission has reasonable cause to believe that a physician is impaired, the commission shall cause an evaluation of such physician to be conducted by the entity or the entity's designee or the commission's designee for the purpose of determining if there is an impairment. The entity or appropriate designee shall report the findings of its evaluation to the commission.

[ 1998 c 132 s 6; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 332; 1987 c 416 s 4. Formerly RCW 18.72.316.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1998 c 132: See notes following RCW 18.71.0195.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Effective date—1987 c 416: See note following RCW 18.71.300.